src/scripts/Slovak/unicodechars.foma
#For downcase:
define UnicodeDowncase 
%Ầ -> %ầ || _ ,,
%Ấ -> %ấ || _ ,,
%Ẫ -> %ẫ || _ ,,
%Ẩ -> %ẩ || _ ,,
%Ā -> %ā || _ ,,
%Ă -> %ă || _ ,,
%Ằ -> %ằ || _ ,,
%Ắ -> %ắ || _ ,,
%Ẵ -> %ẵ || _ ,,
%Ẳ -> %ẳ || _ ,,
%Ȧ -> %ȧ || _ ,,
%Ǡ -> %ǡ || _ ,,
%Ả -> %ả || _ ,,
%Ǻ -> %ǻ || _ ,,
%Ǎ -> %ǎ || _ ,,
%Ȁ -> %ȁ || _ ,,
%Ȃ -> %ȃ || _ ,,
%Ą -> %ą || _ ,,
%Ḃ -> %ḃ || _ ,,
%Ć -> %ć || _ ,,
%Ḉ -> %ḉ || _ ,,
%Ĉ -> %ĉ || _ ,,
%Ċ -> %ċ || _ ,,
%Ḉ -> %ḉ || _ ,,
%Ḋ -> %ḋ || _ ,,
%Ḑ -> %ḑ || _ ,,
%Ề -> %ề || _ ,,
%Ế -> %ế || _ ,,
%Ễ -> %ễ || _ ,,
%Ể -> %ể || _ ,,
%Ẽ -> %ẽ || _ ,,
%Ē -> %ē || _ ,,
%Ḕ -> %ḕ || _ ,,
%Ḗ -> %ḗ || _ ,,
%Ĕ -> %ĕ || _ ,,
%Ḝ -> %ḝ || _ ,,
%Ė -> %ė || _ ,,
%Ẻ -> %ẻ || _ ,,
%Ȅ -> %ȅ || _ ,,
%Ȇ -> %ȇ || _ ,,
%Ȩ -> %ȩ || _ ,,
%Ḝ -> %ḝ || _ ,,
%Ę -> %ę || _ ,,
%Ḟ -> %ḟ || _ ,,
%Ǵ -> %ǵ || _ ,,
%Ĝ -> %ĝ || _ ,,
%Ḡ -> %ḡ || _ ,,
%Ğ -> %ğ || _ ,,
%Ġ -> %ġ || _ ,,
%Ǧ -> %ǧ || _ ,,
%Ģ -> %ģ || _ ,,
%Ĥ -> %ĥ || _ ,,
%Ḣ -> %ḣ || _ ,,
%Ḧ -> %ḧ || _ ,,
%Ȟ -> %ȟ || _ ,,
%Ḩ -> %ḩ || _ ,,
%Ĩ -> %ĩ || _ ,,
%Ī -> %ī || _ ,,
%Ĭ -> %ĭ || _ ,,
%Ḯ -> %ḯ || _ ,,
%Ỉ -> %ỉ || _ ,,
%Ǐ -> %ǐ || _ ,,
%Ȉ -> %ȉ || _ ,,
%Ȋ -> %ȋ || _ ,,
%Į -> %į || _ ,,
%Ĵ -> %ĵ || _ ,,
%Ḱ -> %ḱ || _ ,,
%Ǩ -> %ǩ || _ ,,
%Ķ -> %ķ || _ ,,
%Ļ -> %ļ || _ ,,
%Ḿ -> %ḿ || _ ,,
%Ṁ -> %ṁ || _ ,,
%Ǹ -> %ǹ || _ ,,
%Ń -> %ń || _ ,,
%Ṅ -> %ṅ || _ ,,
%Ņ -> %ņ || _ ,,
%Ṍ -> %ṍ || _ ,,
%Ȭ -> %ȭ || _ ,,
%Ṏ -> %ṏ || _ ,,
%Ō -> %ō || _ ,,
%Ṑ -> %ṑ || _ ,,
%Ṓ -> %ṓ || _ ,,
%Ǭ -> %ǭ || _ ,,
%Ŏ -> %ŏ || _ ,,
%Ȯ -> %ȯ || _ ,,
%Ȱ -> %ȱ || _ ,,
%Ỏ -> %ỏ || _ ,,
%Ő -> %ő || _ ,,
%Ǒ -> %ǒ || _ ,,
%Ȍ -> %ȍ || _ ,,
%Ȏ -> %ȏ || _ ,,
%Ǫ -> %ǫ || _ ,,
%Ǭ -> %ǭ || _ ,,
%Ṕ -> %ṕ || _ ,,
%Ṗ -> %ṗ || _ ,,
%Ṙ -> %ṙ || _ ,,
%Ȑ -> %ȑ || _ ,,
%Ȓ -> %ȓ || _ ,,
%Ŗ -> %ŗ || _ ,,
%Ś -> %ś || _ ,,
%Ṥ -> %ṥ || _ ,,
%Ŝ -> %ŝ || _ ,,
%Ṡ -> %ṡ || _ ,,
%Ș -> %ș || _ ,,
%Ş -> %ş || _ ,,
%Ṫ -> %ṫ || _ ,,
%Ț -> %ț || _ ,,
%Ţ -> %ţ || _ ,,
%Ũ -> %ũ || _ ,,
%Ṹ -> %ṹ || _ ,,
%Ū -> %ū || _ ,,
%Ṻ -> %ṻ || _ ,,
%Ŭ -> %ŭ || _ ,,
%Ủ -> %ủ || _ ,,
%Ű -> %ű || _ ,,
%Ǔ -> %ǔ || _ ,,
%Ȕ -> %ȕ || _ ,,
%Ȗ -> %ȗ || _ ,,
%Ų -> %ų || _ ,,
%Ṽ -> %ṽ || _ ,,
%Ẁ -> %ẁ || _ ,,
%Ẃ -> %ẃ || _ ,,
%Ŵ -> %ŵ || _ ,,
%Ẇ -> %ẇ || _ ,,
%Ẅ -> %ẅ || _ ,,
%Ẋ -> %ẋ || _ ,,
%Ẍ -> %ẍ || _ ,,
%Ỳ -> %ỳ || _ ,,
%Ŷ -> %ŷ || _ ,,
%Ỹ -> %ỹ || _ ,,
%Ȳ -> %ȳ || _ ,,
%Ẏ -> %ẏ || _ ,,
%Ÿ -> %ÿ || _ ,,
%Ỷ -> %ỷ || _ ,,
%Ź -> %ź || _ ,,
%Ẑ -> %ẑ || _ ,,
%Ż -> %ż || _ ,,
%Đ -> %đ || _ ,,
%Ħ -> %ħ || _ ,,
%ĸ -> %ĸ || _ ,,
%Ł -> %ł || _ ,,
%Ŋ -> %ŋ || _ ,,
%Œ -> %œ || _ ,,
%Ŧ -> %ŧ || _ ,,
%Ƀ -> %ƀ || _ ,,
%Ɓ -> %ɓ || _ ,,
%Ƃ -> %ƃ || _ ,,
%Ƅ -> %ƅ || _ ,,
%Ɔ -> %ɔ || _ ,,
%Ƈ -> %ƈ || _ ,,
%Ɖ -> %ɖ || _ ,,
%Ɗ -> %ɗ || _ ,,
%Ƌ -> %ƌ || _ ,,
%ƍ -> %ƍ || _ ,,
%Ǝ -> %ǝ || _ ,,
%Ə -> %ə || _ ,,
%Ɛ -> %ɛ || _ ,,
%Ɠ -> %ɠ || _ ,,
%Ɣ -> %ɣ || _ ,,
%Ƕ -> %ƕ || _ ,,
%Ɩ -> %ɩ || _ ,,
%Ɨ -> %ɨ || _ ,,
%Ƙ -> %ƙ || _ ,,
%Ƚ -> %ƚ || _ ,,
%ƛ -> %ƛ || _ ,,
%Ɯ -> %ɯ || _ ,,
%Ɲ -> %ɲ || _ ,,
%Ƞ -> %ƞ || _ ,,
%Ɵ -> %ɵ || _ ,,
%Ƣ -> %ƣ || _ ,,
%Ƥ -> %ƥ || _ ,,
%Ʀ -> %ʀ || _ ,,
%Ƨ -> %ƨ || _ ,,
%Ʃ -> %ʃ || _ ,,
%ƪ -> %ƪ || _ ,,
%ƫ -> %ƫ || _ ,,
%Ƭ -> %ƭ || _ ,,
%Ʈ -> %ʈ || _ ,,
%Ʊ -> %ʊ || _ ,,
%Ʋ -> %ʋ || _ ,,
%Ƴ -> %ƴ || _ ,,
%Ƶ -> %ƶ || _ ,,
%Ʒ -> %ʒ || _ ,,
%Ƹ -> %ƹ || _ ,,
%ƺ -> %ƺ || _ ,,
%ƻ -> %ƻ || _ ,,
%Ƽ -> %ƽ || _ ,,
%ƾ -> %ƾ || _ ,,
%ǀ -> %ǀ || _ ,,
%ǁ -> %ǁ || _ ,,
%ǂ -> %ǂ || _ ,,
%ǃ -> %ǃ || _ ,,
%Ǥ -> %ǥ || _ ,,
%Ȝ -> %ȝ || _ ,,
%ȡ -> %ȡ || _ ,,
%Ȣ -> %ȣ || _ ,,
%Ȥ -> %ȥ || _ ,,
%ȴ -> %ȴ || _ ,,
%ȵ -> %ȵ || _ ,,
%ȶ -> %ȶ || _ ,,
%ȷ -> %ȷ || _ ,,
%ȸ -> %ȸ || _ ,,
%ȹ -> %ȹ || _ ,,
%Ⱥ -> %ⱥ || _ ,,
%Ȼ -> %ȼ || _ ,,
%Ⱦ -> %ⱦ || _ ,,
%Ȿ -> %ȿ || _ ,,
%Ɀ -> %ɀ || _ ,,
%Ɂ -> %ɂ || _ ,,
%Ʉ -> %ʉ || _ ,,
%Ʌ -> %ʌ || _ ,,
%Ɇ -> %ɇ || _ ,,
%Ɉ -> %ɉ || _ ,,
%Ɋ -> %ɋ || _ ,,
%Ɍ -> %ɍ || _ ,,
%Ɏ -> %ɏ || _ ,,
%Ɐ -> %ɐ || _ ,,
%Ɑ -> %ɑ || _ ,,
%Ɒ -> %ɒ || _ ,,
%ɕ -> %ɕ || _ ,,
%ɘ -> %ɘ || _ ,,
%ɚ -> %ɚ || _ ,,
%Ɜ -> %ɜ || _ ,,
%ɝ -> %ɝ || _ ,,
%ɞ -> %ɞ || _ ,,
%ɟ -> %ɟ || _ ,,
%Ɡ -> %ɡ || _ ,,
%ɢ -> %ɢ || _ ,,
%ɤ -> %ɤ || _ ,,
%Ɥ -> %ɥ || _ ,,
%Ɦ -> %ɦ || _ ,,
%ɧ -> %ɧ || _ ,,
%Ɪ -> %ɪ || _ ,,
%Ɫ -> %ɫ || _ ,,
%Ɬ -> %ɬ || _ ,,
%ɭ -> %ɭ || _ ,,
%ɮ -> %ɮ || _ ,,
%ɰ -> %ɰ || _ ,,
%Ɱ -> %ɱ || _ ,,
%ɳ -> %ɳ || _ ,,
%ɴ -> %ɴ || _ ,,
%ɶ -> %ɶ || _ ,,
%ɷ -> %ɷ || _ ,,
%ɸ -> %ɸ || _ ,,
%ɹ -> %ɹ || _ ,,
%ɺ -> %ɺ || _ ,,
%ɻ -> %ɻ || _ ,,
%ɼ -> %ɼ || _ ,,
%Ɽ -> %ɽ || _ ,,
%ɾ -> %ɾ || _ ,,
%ɿ -> %ɿ || _ ,,
%ʁ -> %ʁ || _ ,,
%Ʂ -> %ʂ || _ ,,
%ʄ -> %ʄ || _ ,,
%ʅ -> %ʅ || _ ,,
%ʆ -> %ʆ || _ ,,
%Ʇ -> %ʇ || _ ,,
%ʍ -> %ʍ || _ ,,
%ʎ -> %ʎ || _ ,,
%ʏ -> %ʏ || _ ,,
%ʐ -> %ʐ || _ ,,
%ʑ -> %ʑ || _ ,,
%ʓ -> %ʓ || _ ,,
%ʔ -> %ʔ || _ ,,
%ʕ -> %ʕ || _ ,,
%ʖ -> %ʖ || _ ,,
%ʗ -> %ʗ || _ ,,
%ʘ -> %ʘ || _ ,,
%ʙ -> %ʙ || _ ,,
%ʚ -> %ʚ || _ ,,
%ʛ -> %ʛ || _ ,,
%ʜ -> %ʜ || _ ,,
%Ʝ -> %ʝ || _ ,,
%Ʞ -> %ʞ || _ ,,
%ʟ -> %ʟ || _ ,,
%ʠ -> %ʠ || _ ,,
%ʡ -> %ʡ || _ ,,
%ʢ -> %ʢ || _ ,,
%ʣ -> %ʣ || _ ,,
%ʤ -> %ʤ || _ ,,
%ʥ -> %ʥ || _ ,,
%ʦ -> %ʦ || _ ,,
%ʧ -> %ʧ || _ ,,
%ʨ -> %ʨ || _ ,,
%ʩ -> %ʩ || _ ,,
%ʪ -> %ʪ || _ ,,
%ʫ -> %ʫ || _ ,,
%ʬ -> %ʬ || _ ,,
%ʭ -> %ʭ || _ ,,
%ʮ -> %ʮ || _ ,,
%ʯ -> %ʯ || _ ;
